Washington statutes.
RCW 27.44.040

Protection of Indian graves—Penalty.

(1) Any person who knowingly removes, mutilates, defaces, injures, or destroys any cairn or grave of any native Indian, or any glyptic or painted record of any tribe or peoples is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW. Persons disturbing native Indian graves through inadvertence, including disturbance through construction, mining, logging, agricultural activity, or any other activity, shall reinter the human remains under the supervision of the appropriate Indian tribe. The expenses of reinterment are to be paid by the *office of archaeology and historic preservation pursuant to RCW 27.34.220.

(2) Any person who sells any native Indian artifacts or any human remains that are known to have been taken from an Indian cairn or grave, is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3) This section does not apply to:

(a) The possession or sale of native Indian artifacts discovered in or taken from locations other than native Indian cairns or graves, or artifacts that were removed from cairns or graves as may be authorized by RCW 27.53.060 or by other than human action; or

(b) Actions taken in the performance of official law enforcement duties.

(4) It shall be a complete defense in the prosecution under this section if the defendant can prove by a preponderance of evidence that the alleged acts were accidental or inadvertent and that reasonable efforts were made to preserve the remains, glyptic, or painted records, or artifacts accidentally disturbed or discovered, and that the accidental discovery or disturbance was properly reported.

[ 1989 c 44 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Powers, duties, and functions of the office of archaeology and historic preservation were transferred to the department of archaeology and historic preservation pursuant to 2005 c 333 s 12.